District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Parkside Canopy Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 104a of the Urban Forest Preservation Act of 2022, effective July 1, 2016
(D.C. Law 21-133; D.C. Official Code § 8-651.04a), is amended by adding a new subsection (e)
to read as follows:
“(e) This section shall not apply to a Heritage Tree located in Lots 865, 866, 867, 868,
and 869 in Square 5056 for which the Zoning Commission has approved a planned unit
development prior to July 1, 2016; provided, that a fee calculated at the rate applicable for
special trees pursuant to section 104 shall be paid for each Heritage Tree removed from the
aforesaid lots.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2